Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF539.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2228HH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 539 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 80B.20 Military veterans with 1 active duty military police experience. 2 1. A veteran may qualify for lateral transfer to a law 3 enforcement agency in this state without completing the academy 4 training program if the veteran meets the following criteria: 5 a. Has served a minimum of four years of active duty in the 6 United States armed forces. 7 b. Has held a primary military occupational specialty or 8 equivalent designation as a military police officer in the 9 army, or its equivalent in other branches. 10 c. Has successfully completed accredited military police 11 training equivalent to or exceeding the academyâs standards. 12 d. Has received an honorable discharge or a general 13 discharge under honorable conditions. 14 2. An eligible veteran shall submit an application to the 15 council for evaluation. The application shall include all of 16 the following: 17 a. Proof of military service and discharge status. 18 b. Certification of military police training and experience. 19 c. Documentation of relevant duties performed during active 20 duty. 21 3. The council shall review the applications and issue a 22 certificate of equivalency to veterans who meet the eligibility 23 criteria. 24 4. Veterans granted a certificate of equivalency must do all 25 of the following: 26 a. Complete a one-week Iowa-specific law enforcement 27 orientation course administered by the academy, focusing on 28 state laws, procedures, and community policing. 29 b. Undergo any required background checks and psychological 30 evaluations as required for all new law enforcement hires in 31 the state. 32 5. The council shall develop procedures and guidelines for 33 evaluating military police training and equivalency standards. 34 6. The council shall publish an annual report including 35 -1- LSB 2228HH (2) 91 as/js 1/ 3 H.F. 539 data on the number of veterans transitioning to state law 1 enforcement and the veteransâ performance in law enforcement 2 roles. 3